Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5644.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-23.3-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-23.3 entitled
"Nontransparent Windshields and Windows" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-23.3-5. Penalties.
(a) Any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity that installs any sunscreening
material which is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than
two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each offense a first violation and shall be fined three hundred
seventy-five dollars ($375) for a second violation and five hundred dollars ($500) for a third or
subsequent violation.
(b) Any person who, firm, corporation, or other business entity that owns or operates a
motor vehicle which has installed on it any sunscreening device or material in violation of this
chapter shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first violation and shall
be fined three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375) for a second violation and five hundred dollars
($500) for a third or subsequent violation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001768
========